District of Columbia statutes.
29-610.06

Judicial review of denial of reinstatement.

(a)

If the Mayor denies a partnership’s application for reinstatement following administrative revocation of the partnership’s statement of qualification, the Mayor shall serve the partnership with notice in a record that explains the reasons for the denial.

(b)

A partnership may seek judicial review of a denial of reinstatement in Superior Court not later than 30 days after service of the notice of denial.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(10), 59 DCR 13171

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.